California statutes. Probate Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4457.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to insurance and annuity transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Continue, pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate a contract procured by or on behalf of the principal that insures or provides an annuity to either the principal or another person, whether or not the principal is a beneficiary under the contract.

(b) Procure new, different, and additional contracts of insurance and annuities for the principal and the principal’s spouse, children, and other dependents, and select the amount, type of insurance
 or annuity, and mode of payment.

(c) Pay the premium or assessment on, modify, rescind, release, or terminate a contract of insurance or annuity procured by the agent.

(d) Apply for and receive a loan on the security of the contract of insurance or annuity.

(e) Surrender and receive the cash surrender value.

(f) Exercise an election.

(g) Change the manner of paying premiums.

(h) Change or convert the type of insurance contract or annuity as to any insurance contract or annuity with respect to which the principal has or claims to have a power described in this section.

(i) Apply for and procure government aid to guarantee or pay premiums of a contract of insurance on the life of the principal.

(j) Collect, sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow upon, or pledge the interest of the principal in a contract of insurance or annuity.

(k) Pay from proceeds or otherwise, compromise or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with, a tax or assessment levied by a taxing authority with respect to a contract of insurance or annuity or its proceeds or liability accruing by reason of the tax or assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 5.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to estate, trust, and other beneficiary transactions, empowers the agent to act for the principal in all matters that affect a trust, probate estate, guardianship, conservatorship, escrow, custodianship, or other fund from which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled, as a beneficiary, to a share or payment, including the power to do all of the following:

(a) Accept, receive, receipt for, sell, assign, pledge, or exchange, a share in, or payment from, the fund.

(b) Demand or obtain by litigation or otherwise money or other thing of value to which
 the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled by reason of the fund.

(c) Initiate, participate in, and oppose litigation to ascertain the meaning, validity, or effect of a deed, will, declaration of trust, or other instrument or transaction affecting the interest of the principal.

(d) Initiate, participate in, and oppose litigation to remove, substitute, or surcharge a fiduciary.

(e) Conserve, invest, disburse, and use anything received for an authorized purpose.

(f) Transfer an interest of the principal in real property, stocks, bonds, accounts with financial institutions, insurance, and other property, to the trustee of a revocable trust created by the principal as settlor.

(g) Disclaim a detrimental transfer to the principal with the approval of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 6.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4459.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language with respect to claims and litigation empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Assert and prosecute before a court or administrative agency a claim, claim for relief, cause of action, counterclaim, cross-complaint, or offset, and defend against an individual, a legal entity, or government, including suits to recover property or other thing of value, to recover damages sustained by the principal, to eliminate or modify tax liability, or to seek an injunction, specific performance, or other relief.

(b) Bring an action to determine adverse
 claims, intervene in litigation, and act as amicus curiae.

(c) In connection with litigation:

(1) Procure an attachment, garnishment, libel, order of arrest, or other preliminary, provisional, or intermediate relief and use any available procedure to effect, enforce, or satisfy a judgment, order, or decree.

(2) Perform any lawful act, including acceptance of tender, offer of judgment, admission of facts, submission of a controversy on an agreed statement of facts, consent to examination before trial, and binding the principal in litigation.

(d) Submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim or litigation.

(e) Waive the issuance and service of process upon the principal, accept service of process, appear for the principal, designate persons upon whom process directed to the principal may be served, execute and file or deliver stipulations on the principal’s behalf, verify pleadings, seek appellate review, procure and give surety and indemnity bonds, contract and pay for the preparation and printing of records and briefs, receive and execute and file or deliver a consent, waiver, release, satisfaction of judgment, notice, agreement, or other instrument in connection with the prosecution, settlement, or defense of a claim or litigation.

(f) Act for the principal with respect to bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings, whether voluntary or involuntary, concerning the principal or some
 other person, or with respect to a reorganization proceeding, or with respect to an assignment for the benefit of creditors, receivership, or application for the appointment of a receiver or trustee which affects an interest of the principal in property or other thing of value.

(g) Pay a judgment against the principal or a settlement made in connection with litigation and receive and conserve money or other thing of value paid in settlement of or as proceeds of a claim or litigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 851, Sec. 7.   (SB 688)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4460.

(a) In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to personal and family maintenance empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(1) Do the acts necessary to maintain the customary standard of living of the principal, the principal’s spouse, children, and other individuals customarily or legally entitled to be supported by the principal, including providing living quarters by purchase, lease, or other contract, or paying the operating costs, including interest, amortization payments, repairs, and taxes on premises owned by the principal and occupied by those individuals.

(2) Provide
 for the individuals described in paragraph (1) all of the following:

(A) Normal domestic help.

(B) Usual vacations and travel expenses.

(C) Funds for shelter, clothing, food, appropriate education, and other current living costs.

(3) Pay for the individuals described in paragraph (1) necessary medical, dental, and surgical care, hospitalization, and custodial care.

(4) Continue any provision made by the principal, for the individuals described in paragraph (1), for automobiles or other means of transportation, including registering, licensing, insuring, and replacing them.

(5) Maintain or open charge accounts for the
 convenience of the individuals described in paragraph (1) and open new accounts the agent considers desirable to accomplish a lawful purpose.

(6) Continue payments incidental to the membership or affiliation of the principal in a church, club, society, order, or other organization and continue contributions to those organizations.

(b) The authority of an agent with respect to personal and family maintenance under this section is not dependent on any other grant of authority to the agent to make gifts on the principal’s behalf and is not limited by any limitation that otherwise applies to the authority of the agent to make gifts on the principal’s behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 7.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to benefits from social security, Medicare, Medicaid, or other governmental programs, or civil or military service, empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Execute vouchers in the name of the principal for allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign government or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4460, and for shipment of their household effects.

(b) Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal from a post, warehouse,
 depot, dock, or other place of storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private, and execute and deliver a release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument for that purpose.

(c) Prepare, file, and prosecute a claim of the principal to a benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal claims to be entitled, under a statute or governmental regulation.

(d) Prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to any benefits the principal may be entitled to receive.

(e) Receive the financial proceeds of a claim of the type described in this section, conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for a lawful purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 138.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4462.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to retirement plan transactions empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Select payment options under any retirement plan in which the principal participates, including plans for self-employed individuals.

(b) Make voluntary contributions to those plans.

(c) Exercise the investment powers available under any self-directed retirement plan.

(d) Make rollovers of plan benefits into other retirement plans.

(e) If authorized by the plan, borrow from, sell assets to, and purchase assets from the plan.

(f) Waive the right of the principal to be a beneficiary of a joint or survivor annuity if the principal is a spouse who is not employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 9.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.

In a statutory form power of attorney, the language granting power with respect to tax matters empowers the agent to do all of the following:

(a) Prepare, sign, and file federal, state, local, and foreign income, gift, payroll, Federal Insurance Contributions Act returns, and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests for extension of time, petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related documents, including receipts, offers, waivers, consents (including consents and agreements under Internal Revenue Code Section 2032A or any successor section), closing agreements, and any power of attorney required by the Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority with respect to a tax year upon which the statute of limitations has not run and to the tax year in which the power of attorney was executed and any subsequent tax year.

(b) Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds, receive confidential information, and contest deficiencies determined by the Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority.

(c) Exercise any election available to the principal under federal, state, local, or foreign tax law.

(d) Act for the principal in all tax matters for all periods before the Internal Revenue Service and any other taxing authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4464.

The powers described in this chapter are exercisable equally with respect to an interest the principal has when the statutory form power of attorney is executed or acquires later, whether or not the property is located in this state, and whether or not the powers are exercised or the power of attorney is executed in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 307, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4465.

A statutory form power of attorney under this part does not empower the agent to take any of the actions specified in Section 4264 unless the statutory form power of attorney expressly grants that authority to the attorney-in-fact.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 113, Sec. 11.   (AB 1082)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS CONCERNING POWERS OF ATTORNEY [4500. - 4545.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4500. - 4505.]

4500.

A power of attorney is exercisable free of judicial intervention, subject to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.

The remedies provided in this part are cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

Except as provided in Section 4503, this part is not subject to limitation in the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a power of attorney may expressly eliminate the authority of a person listed in Section 4540 to petition the court for any one or more of the purposes enumerated in Section 4541 if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The power of attorney is executed by the principal at a time when the principal has the advice of a lawyer authorized to practice law in the state where the power of attorney is executed.

(2) The principal’s lawyer signs a certificate stating in substance:
“I am a lawyer authorized to practice law in the state where this power of attorney was executed, and the principal was my client at the time this power of attorney was executed. I have advised my client concerning his or her rights in connection with this power of attorney and the applicable law and the consequences of signing or not signing this power of attorney, and my client, after being so advised, has executed this power of attorney.”

(b) A power of attorney may not limit the authority of the attorney-in-fact, the principal, the conservator of the person or estate of the principal, or the public guardian to petition under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

There is no right to a jury trial in proceedings under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4505.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the general provisions in Division 3 (commencing with Section 1000) apply to proceedings under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Jurisdiction and Venue [4520. - 4523.]

4520.

(a) The superior court has jurisdiction in proceedings under this division.

(b) The court in proceedings under this division is a court of general jurisdiction and the court, or a judge of the court, has the same power and authority with respect to the proceedings as otherwise provided by law for a superior court, or a judge of the superior court, including, but not limited to, the matters authorized by Section 128 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.

The court may exercise jurisdiction in proceedings under this division on any basis permitted by Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4522.

Without limiting Section 4521, a person who acts as an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney governed by this division is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to matters relating to acts and transactions of the attorney-in-fact performed in this state or affecting property or a principal in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4523.

The proper county for commencement of a proceeding under this division shall be determined in the following order of priority:

(a) The county in which the principal resides.

(b) The county in which the attorney-in-fact resides.

(c) A county in which property subject to the power of attorney is located.

(d) Any other county that is in the principal’s best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Petitions, Orders,Appeals [4540. - 4545.]

4540.

Subject to Section 4503, a petition may be filed under this part by any of the following persons:

(a) The attorney-in-fact.

(b) The principal.

(c) The spouse of the principal.

(d) A relative of the principal.

(e) The conservator of the person or estate of the principal.

(f) The court investigator, described in Section 1454, of the county where the power of attorney was executed or where the principal resides.

(g) The public guardian of the county where the power of attorney was executed or where the principal resides.

(h) The personal representative or trustee of the principal’s estate.

(i) The principal’s successor in interest.

(j) A person who is requested in writing by an attorney-in-fact to take action.

(k) Any other interested person or friend of the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4541.

A petition may be filed under this part for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) Determining whether the power of attorney is in effect or has terminated.

(b) Passing on the acts or proposed acts of the attorney-in-fact, including approval of authority to disobey the principal’s instructions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4234.

(c) Compelling the attorney-in-fact to submit the attorney-in-fact’s accounts or report the attorney-in-fact’s acts as attorney-in-fact to the principal, the spouse of the principal, the conservator of the person or the estate of the principal, or to any other person required by the court in its discretion, if the attorney-in-fact has failed to submit an accounting or report within 60 days after written request from the person filing the petition.

(d) Declaring that the authority of the attorney-in-fact is revoked on a determination by the court of all of the following:

(1) The attorney-in-fact has violated or is unfit to perform the fiduciary duties under the power of attorney.

(2) At the time of the determination by the court, the principal lacks the capacity to give or to revoke a power of attorney.

(3) The revocation of the attorney-in-fact’s authority is in the best interest of the principal or the principal’s estate.

(e) Approving the resignation of the attorney-in-fact:

(1) If the attorney-in-fact is subject to a duty to act under Section 4230, the court may approve the resignation, subject to any orders the court determines are necessary to protect the principal’s interests.

(2) If the attorney-in-fact is not subject to a duty to act under Section 4230, the court shall approve the resignation, subject to the court’s discretion to require the attorney-in-fact to give notice to other interested persons.

(f) Compelling a third person to honor the authority of an attorney-in-fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4542.

A proceeding under this part is commenced by filing a petition stating facts showing that the petition is authorized under this part, the grounds of the petition, and, if known to the petitioner, the terms of the power of attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4543.

The court may dismiss a petition if it appears that the proceeding is not reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the principal or the principal’s estate and shall stay or dismiss the proceeding in whole or in part when required by Section 410.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4544.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), at least 15 days before the time set for hearing, the petitioner shall serve notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, on the following:

(1) The attorney-in-fact if not the petitioner.

(2) The principal if not the petitioner.

(b) In the case of a petition to compel a third person to honor the authority of an attorney-in-fact, notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the third person in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.

In a proceeding under this part commenced by the filing of a petition by a person other than the attorney-in-fact, the court may in its discretion award reasonable attorney’s fees to one of the following:

(a) The attorney-in-fact, if the court determines that the proceeding was commenced without any reasonable cause.

(b) The person commencing the proceeding, if the court determines that the attorney-in-fact has clearly violated the fiduciary duties under the power of attorney or has failed without any reasonable cause or justification to submit accounts or report acts to the principal or conservator of the estate or of the person, as the case may be, after written request from the principal or conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.7. HEALTH CARE DECISIONS [4600. - 4806.]



PART 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL [4600. - 4665.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title and Definitions [4600. - 4643.]

4600.

This division may be cited as the Health Care Decisions Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4605.

“Advance health care directive” or “advance directive” means either an individual health care instruction or a power of attorney for health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4607.

(a) “Agent” means an individual designated in a power of attorney for health care to make a health care decision for the principal, regardless of whether the person is known as an agent or attorney-in-fact, or by some other term.

(b) “Agent” includes a successor or alternate agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4609.

“Capacity” means a person’s ability to understand the nature and consequences of a decision and to make and communicate a decision, and includes in the case of proposed health care, the ability to understand its significant benefits, risks, and alternatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 230, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4611.

“Community care facility” means a “community care facility” as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4613.

“Conservator” means a court-appointed conservator having authority to make a health care decision for a patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.

“Health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or otherwise affect a patient’s physical or mental health condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 21, Sec. 1.   (AB 2288)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4617.

(a) “Health care decision” means a decision made by a patient or the patient’s agent, conservator, or surrogate, regarding the patient’s health care, including the following:

(1) Selection and discharge of health care providers and institutions.

(2) Approval or disapproval of diagnostic tests, surgical procedures, and programs of medication, including mental health conditions.

(3) Directions to provide, withhold, or withdraw artificial nutrition and hydration and all other forms of health care, including cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(b) “Health care decision” does not include a decision made by a patient’s agent, conservator, or surrogate to consent to treatments identified in Section 4652.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   (AB 1029)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4619.

“Health care institution” means an institution, facility, or agency licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care in the ordinary course of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.

“Health care provider” means an individual licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by the law of this state to provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4623.

“Individual health care instruction” or “individual instruction” means a patient’s written or oral direction concerning a health care decision for the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.

“Patient” means an adult whose health care is under consideration, and includes a principal under a power of attorney for health care and an adult who has given an individual health care instruction or designated a surrogate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4627.

“Physician” means a physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4629.

“Power of attorney for health care” means a written instrument designating an agent to make health care decisions for the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4631.

“Primary physician” means a physician designated by a patient or the patient’s agent, conservator, or surrogate, to have primary responsibility for the patient’s health care or, in the absence of a designation or if the designated physician is not reasonably available or declines to act as primary physician, a physician who undertakes the responsibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4633.

“Principal” means an adult who executes a power of attorney for health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4635.

“Reasonably available” means readily able to be contacted without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner considering the urgency of the patient’s health care needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4637.

“Residential care facility for the elderly” means a “residential care facility for the elderly” as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4639.

“Skilled nursing facility” means a “skilled nursing facility” as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.

“Supervising health care provider” means the primary physician or, if there is no primary physician or the primary physician is not reasonably available, the health care provider who has undertaken primary responsibility for a patient’s health care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4643.

“Surrogate” means an adult, other than a patient’s agent or conservator, authorized under this division to make a health care decision for the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [4650. - 4660.]

4650.

The Legislature finds the following:

(a) In recognition of the dignity and privacy a person has a right to expect, the law recognizes that an adult has the fundamental right to control the decisions relating to his or her own health care, including the decision to have life-sustaining treatment withheld or withdrawn.

(b) Modern medical technology has made possible the artificial prolongation of human life beyond natural limits. In the interest of protecting individual autonomy, this prolongation of the process of dying for a person for whom continued health care does not improve the prognosis for recovery may violate patient dignity and cause unnecessary pain and suffering, while providing nothing medically necessary or beneficial to the person.

(c) In the absence of controversy, a court is normally not the proper forum in which to make health care decisions, including decisions regarding life-sustaining treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, this division applies to health care decisions for adults who lack capacity to make health care decisions for themselves.

(b) This division does not affect any of the following:

(1) The right of an individual to make health care decisions while having the capacity to do so.

(2) The law governing health care in an emergency.

(3) The law governing health care for unemancipated minors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

This division does not authorize consent to any of the following on behalf of a patient:

(a) Commitment to or placement in a mental health treatment facility.

(b) Convulsive treatment (as defined in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(c) Psychosurgery (as defined in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(d) Sterilization.

(e) Abortion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to condone, authorize, or approve mercy killing, assisted suicide, or euthanasia. This division is not intended to permit any affirmative or deliberate act or omission to end life other than withholding or withdrawing health care pursuant to an advance health care directive, by a surrogate, or as otherwise provided, so as to permit the natural process of dying.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

This division does not authorize or require a health care provider or health care institution to provide health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or health care institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

(a) This division does not create a presumption concerning the intention of a patient who has not made or who has revoked an advance health care directive.

(b) In making health care decisions under this division, a patient’s attempted suicide shall not be construed to indicate a desire of the patient that health care be restricted or inhibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

Death resulting from withholding or withdrawing health care in accordance with this division does not for any purpose constitute a suicide or homicide or legally impair or invalidate a policy of insurance or an annuity providing a death benefit, notwithstanding any term of the policy or annuity to the contrary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

A patient is presumed to have the capacity to make a health care decision, to give or revoke an advance health care directive, and to designate or disqualify a surrogate. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.

Unless otherwise specified in a written advance health care directive, for the purposes of this division, a determination that a patient lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists that affects an individual health care instruction or the authority of an agent or surrogate, shall be made by the primary physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), none of the following persons may make health care decisions as an agent under a power of attorney for health care or a surrogate under this division:

(1) The supervising health care provider or an employee of the health care institution where the patient is receiving care.

(2) An operator or employee of a community care facility or residential care facility where the patient is receiving care.

(b) The prohibition in subdivision (a) does not apply to the following persons:

(1) An employee, other than the supervising health care provider, who is related to the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption, or is a registered domestic partner of the patient.

(2) An employee, other than the supervising health care provider, who is employed by the same health care institution, community care facility, or residential care facility for the elderly as the patient.

(c) A conservator under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) may not be designated as an agent or surrogate to make health care decisions by the conservatee, unless all of the following are satisfied:

(1) The advance health care directive is otherwise valid.

(2) The conservatee is represented by legal counsel.

(3) The lawyer representing the conservatee signs a certificate stating in substance:
“I am a lawyer authorized to practice law in the state where this advance health care directive was executed, and the principal or patient was my client at the time this advance directive was executed. I have advised my client concerning his or her rights in connection with this advance directive and the applicable law and the consequences of signing or not signing this advance directive, and my client, after being so advised, has executed this advance directive.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 230, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4660.

A copy of a written advance health care directive, revocation of an advance directive, or designation or disqualification of a surrogate has the same effect as the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------


